District of Columbia statutes.
31-3804

Applicability of chapter.

The requirements of this chapter shall apply:

(1)

To all insurance policies and subscriber contracts delivered or issued for delivery in the District more than 120 days after October 20, 1979.

(2)

To all such insurance policies and subscriber contracts renewed, amended or reissued after 120 days following October 20, 1979;

(3)

To only children born more than 120 days after October 20, 1979;

(4)

To all individual subscriber contracts and group certificates issued or delivered in the District of Columbia by Group Hospitalization and Medical Services, Inc.;

(5)

To all for-profit as well as nonprofit indemnity type health insurers issuing or delivering individual indemnity type accident and sickness health insurance policies and group certificates in the District of Columbia; and

(6)

To health insurance certificates, except those described in § 31-3802(2) [repealed], that are delivered within the District of Columbia from group health insurance policies which are sold outside of the District of Columbia.

History

Oct. 20, 1979, D.C. Law 3-33, § 5, 26 DCR 1116
May 21, 1992, D.C. Law 9-99, § 2(b), 39 DCR 2142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1104.
1973 Ed., § 35-2004.